Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-218
Governor; convey state's reversionary interest in described property.

The Governor is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement to sell and convey the state's reversionary interest in the public way legally described as follows: Calvert Street from the east line of 13th Street to the west line of 14th Street, abutted by block 23, Fairmont Addition, and abutted by the northeast quarter of section 2, township 9 North, range 6 East, in the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska.

Laws 1976, LB 999, § 1.